en: mirabelle plum
cs: Slivoň mirabelka
da: Mirabelblomme
de: Mirabelle
el: Πραουστιά
eo: Mirabelo
fa: آلو قطره‌طلا
fi: mirabelle-luumu
fr: mirabelle, mirabelles
ga: Miribéal
hi: मिराबॅल आलू बुख़ारा
hr: šljiva mirabela
hu: Mórabóra
io: Mirabelo
it: prugna Mirabelle
ka: მირაბელი
la: Prunus domestica var. syriaca
lt: Geltonoji slyva
nl: Mirabelle
pl: Śliwa mirabelka
ru: Мирабель
sv: Mirabelle
zh: 黃香李

en: malaceous fruit
it: frutto malaceo
lv: ļaundabīgi augļi
nl: appelvrucht

en: apple, apples
af: appel
am: ፖም
an: Mazana
ar: تفاح
av: гӏеч
az: Alma
ba: алма
be: яблык
bg: Ябълка, ябълки
bi: Apol
bn: আপেল
bo: ཀུ་ཤུ།
br: Aval
bs: Jabuka
ca: poma, pommes
ce: Ӏаж
co: mela
cs: jablko
cu: аблъко
cv: Панулми
cy: afal
da: æble, æbler
de: Apfel, Äpfel
dv: އާފަލް
el: Μήλο, μήλα
eo: pomo
es: manzana
et: õun, õunad
eu: Sagar
fa: سیب
fi: omena, omenaa
fj: Yapolo
fo: súrepli
fr: pomme, pommes
fy: appel
ga: Úll
gd: ubhal
gl: Mazá
gn: Guavirana'a
gu: સફરજન
gv: Ooyl
he: תפוח
hi: सेब
hr: jabuka, jabuke, jabuka plod, plod jabuke, od jabuke, jabučnog
ht: Pòm
hu: alma
hy: խնձոր
ia: Pomo
id: Apel
ie: pom
io: pomo
is: Epli
it: mela, mele
ja: りんご, リンゴ, アップル
jv: Apel
ka: ვაშლი
kk: Алма
km: ប៉ុម
kn: ಸೇಬು
ko: 사과
ks: ژوٗنٛٹھ
ku: Sêv
kw: Aval
ky: алма
la: Malum
lb: Apel
li: appel
lo: ໝາກປົ່ມ
lt: Obuolys, obuoliai
lv: ābols, āboli
mg: Paoma
mi: āporo
mk: јаболко
ml: ആപ്പിൾ
mn: Алим
mr: सफरचंद
mt: tuffieħa
my: ပန်းသီး
nb: eple
ne: स्याउ
nl: appel, appelen, appels
nn: eple
nv: Bilasáana
oc: Poma
or: ସେଓ
os: Фæткъуы
pa: ਸੇਬ
pi: sītāphala
pl: jabłko, jabłka, jabłek, jabłkowy, owoc jabłka
ps: مڼه
pt: Maçã, maçãs
qu: Mansana
ro: măr, mere
ru: яблоко, яблоки
rw: Pome
sa: सेवफलम्
sc: Mela
sd: اَنبِڙِي
sh: Jabuka
si: ඇපල්
sk: jablko
sl: Jabolko
sm: Apu
sq: Molla
sr: јабука
st: apole
su: Apel
sv: äpple, äpplen
sw: Tofaa
ta: ஆப்பிள்
te: ఆపిల్
tg: Себ
th: แอปเปิล
ti: ቱፋሕ
tk: alma
tl: Mansanas
tn: Apole
tr: Elma
tt: алма
ug: ئالما
uk: яблуко, яблучний
ur: سیب
uz: Olma
ve: Apula
vi: táo tây
vo: pod
wa: Pemî
wo: pom
xh: iapule
yi: עפל
yo: èso òro òyìnbó
za: Makbinzgoj
zh: 蘋果
zu: Ihhabhula

en: dessert apple
fr: pomme de table, pommes de tables
it: mela da dessert

en: cooking apple
fr: pomme à cuire, pommes à cuire
it: mela da cucina

en: Pink Lady apple
es: Manzana Pink Lady
fr: pomme Pink Lady
hr: ružičasta ženska jabuka
it: Mela Pink Lady
nl: Pink Lady appels, Pink Lady

en: bramley apple
de: Bromley Apfel
it: mela Bramley

en: Golden Delicious apple
de: Golden Delicious Apfel
es: manzana golden
fi: golden delicious -omena
fr: pomme Golden Delicious, pommes Golden Delicious, pommes golden
hr: zlatna delišes jabuka
it: mela Golden Delicious

en: Gala apple, Gala apples
de: Gala Apfel
es: manzana gala
fr: pomme Gala, pommes Gala
hr: gala jabuka
it: mela Gala
nl: Gala appel

en: Granny Smith apple, Granny apple
es: manzana Granny
fr: pomme Granny, pomme Granny Smith, pommes Grany, pommes Granny Smith
hr: baka jabuka
it: mela Granny
nl: Granny Smith, Granny Smith appel, Granny Smith appels

en: Royal Gala apple
de: Royal Gala Apfel, Royal Gala Äpfel
fr: pomme Royal Gala, pommes Royal Gala
hr: kraljevska gala jabuka
it: mela Royal Gala
nl: Royal Gala appel, Tenroy, Tenroy appel

en: Idared apple
da: Idared æble, Idared æbler
it: mela Idared
sv: Idared äpple, Idared äpplen

en: cinnamon apple
de: Zimtapfel
es: manzana canela
fr: pomme cannelle
hr: jabuka s cimetom
it: cannella di mele

en: green apple
bg: зелена ябълка, зелени ябълки
de: grüner Apfel, grüne Äpfel
es: manzana verde, manzanas verdes
fr: pomme verte, pommes vertes
hr: zelena jabuka
it: mela verde

en: red apple
bg: червена ябълка, червени ябълки
da: rødt æble, røde æbler
de: roter Apfel, rote Äpfel
es: manzana roja, manzanas rojas
fi: punakuorinen omena
fr: Pomme rouge, pommes rouges
hr: crvena Jabuka
it: mela rossa
sv: rött äpple, röda äpplen

en: Idared red apple
da: Idared rødt æble, Idared røde æbler
it: mela rossa Idared
sv: Idared rött äpple, Idared röda äpplen

en: Organic apple
bg: био ябълки, био ябълка
de: Bio Äpfel
es: manzana orgánica
fi: luomuomena, luomu omena
fr: pomme bio, Pommes bio
hr: organska jabuka
it: mele bio
nl: biologische appel, Biologische appels

en: cider apples
fr: pommes à cidre
it: mele da sidro

en: dried apple, dried apples
bg: сушени ябълки, ябълки сушени
cs: sušenná jablka
de: getrocknete Äpfel, Äpfel getrocknet
es: manzana deshidratada, manzanas deshidratadas
fi: kuivattu omena
fr: pomme séchée, pommes séchées, pommes déshydratées
he: תפוח מיובש, תפוחים מיובשים
hr: sušene jabuke
hu: szárított almadarabkák
it: mele secche
nl: gedroogde appel
pl: liofilizowane jabłka, suszony owoc jabłka
pt: maçãs desidratadas
ru: Сушеное яблоко
sk: sušené jablká
sv: torkat äpple
th: แอปเปิลอบแห้ง

da: tørrede æbleskiver
nl: gedroogde appelschijfjes
sv: torkade äppelskivor